Maryland, session 2025, SB0488.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(r) (1) “Manufacturing” means the process of substantially transforming, or a
substantial step in the process of substantially transforming, tangible personal property
into a new and different article of tangible personal property by use of labor or machinery.
(2) “Manufacturing” includes:
(i) the operation of sawmills, grain mills, or feed mills;
(ii) the operation of machinery and equipment used to extract and
process minerals, metals, or earthen materials or by–products that result from the
extracting or processing;
(iii) research and development activities, whether or not the company
has a product for sale;
(iv) the identification, design, or genetic engineering of biological
materials for research or manufacture; and
(v) the design, development, or creation of computer software for
sale, lease, or license.
(3) “Manufacturing” does not include:
(i) activities that are primarily a service;
(ii) activities that are intellectual, artistic, or clerical in nature;
(iii) public utility services, including telephone, gas, electric, water,
and steam production services; or
(iv) any other activity that would not commonly be considered as
manufacturing.
(dd) “Property tax” means the property tax imposed by:
(1) the State;

SENATE BILL 488 3
(2) a county; or
(3) a municipal corporation.
6–104.
Except as otherwise provided in §§ 7–222, 7–225.1, and 7–226 of this article, any
stock in business of a person who engages in a manufacturing or commercial business in
the State is subject to property tax.
7–109.
(a) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 7–225.1 OF THIS TITLE, personal
property described in §§ 7–222, 7–225, and 7–226 of this title is subject to the municipal
corporation property tax unless exempted in full or in part by the governing body of the
municipal corporation by law.
7–222.
(a) Except as provided in § 7–109 of this title and in subsection (b) of this section,
the stock in business of a person engaged in a manufacturing or commercial business is not
subject to property tax.
(b) Except as provided by § 7–108 of this title AND § 7–225.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE,
the personal property described in subsection (a) of this section is subject to a county
property tax on 35% of its assessment in Wicomico County.
7–225.
(a) Except as provided in § 7–109 of this title and in subsection (b) of this section,
if used in manufacturing, the following personal property, however operated and whether
or not in use, is not subject to property tax:
(1) tools;
(2) implements;
(3) machinery; or
(4) manufacturing apparatus or engines.
(b) Except as provided by § 7–108 of this title AND § 7–225.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE,
the personal property listed in subsection (a) of this section is subject to a county property
tax on:

SENATE BILL 488
(1) 100% of its assessment in Garrett County, Somerset County, Wicomico
County, and Worcester County; and
(2) 75% of its assessment in Allegany County.
(c) Property does not qualify for the exemption under this section if the property
is used primarily in administration, management, sales, storage, shipping, receiving, or
any other nonmanufacturing activity.
(d) In order to qualify for the exemption under this section, a person claiming the
exemption must apply for and be granted the exemption by the Department.
7–225.1.
ALL PERSONAL PROPERTY, INCLUDING MANUFACTURING INVENTORY, IN THE
POSSESSION OF A PERSON ENGAGED IN A MANUFACTURING BUSINESS THAT IS A
SMALL OR MEDIUM–SIZED ENTERPRISE IS EXEMPT FROM PROPERTY TAX,
INCLUDING ANY SPECIAL TAXING DISTRICT PROPERTY TAX.
7–508.
(a) In this section, “manufacturer” means a person who engages in at least 2 of
the following processes:
(1) applies labor, skill, art, or science to materials;
(2) makes changes or modifications in existing material by processes
usually considered as manufacturing;
(3) develops new forms, qualities, properties, or combinations of materials,
or adapts materials to certain uses; or
(4) produces from materials a different kind of material with a new use.
(b) [The] SUBJECT TO § 7–225.1 OF THIS TITLE, THE governing body of
Washington County may exempt the raw materials used in a manufacturing process and
manufactured products in the possession of a manufacturer from the Washington County
property tax.
7–522.
(A) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION MAY EXEMPT FROM
THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION PROPERTY TAX ALL PERSONAL
PROPERTY, INCLUDING MANUFACTURING INVENTORY, IN THE POSSESSION OF A

SENATE BILL 488 5
PERSON ENGAGED IN A MANUFACTURING BUSINESS THAT EMPLOYS 50 OR FEWER
EMPLOYEES.
(B) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION MAY PROVIDE, BY
LAW, FOR REGULATIONS, PROCEDURES, AND ANY OTHER PROVISION NECESSARY TO
CARRY OUT THE EXEMPTION UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.